Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-12,211
Matching funds; receipt; conditions; payment.

(1) Subject to section 81-12,213, an applicant shall be entitled to receive matching funds from the State of Nebraska as follows:

(a) For any amount of investment up to two million five hundred thousand dollars made by the applicant by the end of the transformational period, the applicant shall be entitled to receive two dollars of matching funds for each such dollar of investment; and

(b) For any amount of investment in excess of two million five hundred thousand dollars made by the applicant by the end of the transformational period, the applicant shall be entitled to receive five dollars of matching funds for each such dollar of investment.

(2) Subject to section 81-12,213, the state shall pay the available matching funds to the applicant on an annual basis.

Laws 2021, LB40, § 17.